Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1794.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Waterfront Redevelopment Grant Program Act.Section 2. Legislative intent.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The primary objectives of this act are to revitalize coastal waters and waterfronts across this Commonwealth, create new jobs and stimulate private investment, increase property values and provide waterfront access for the public.(2) The establishment of a grant program to provide money for waterfront redevelopment across this Commonwealth 1234567891011121314151617 would protect and enhance the health and well-being of our Commonwealth's environment.(3) A vibrant and healthy environment, especially along the coastal waters and waterfronts of this Commonwealth, would improve the overall health and well-being of citizens throughout this Commonwealth.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." Any of the following seeking a grant under the program:(1) A municipal or county government or other political subdivision.(2) An industrial or economic development or redevelopment authority or entity."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Waterfront Redevelopment Fund established under section 5."Program." The Waterfront Redevelopment Grant Program established under section 4(a)(1)."Waterfront redevelopment plan." A plan that provides for the improvement of a waterfront and meets the requirements under section 4(c).Section 4. Waterfront Redevelopment Grant Program.(a) Establishment and purpose.--(1) The Waterfront Redevelopment Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the department.(2) The purpose of the program is to issue grants to 20250HB1794PN2207 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protect and revitalize coastal waters and waterfronts across this Commonwealth.(b) Application.--(1) An applicant must submit a written grant application to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(2) An application under this section must include the following information:(i) A detailed description of the project and how the grant would be used, including any private sector participation.(ii) A copy of the waterfront redevelopment plan required under subsection (c) for the area in which the project is to be located.(iii) An explanation of how the project will contribute significantly to economic and community redevelopment or the revitalization of adjacent communities.(iv) An explanation of how the project will provide for public access to the waterfront or will provide recreational opportunities for the public, if applicable.(v) If the project includes the purchase of property, an identification of the intended use of the property and a timeline for redevelopment of the property.(vi) The total cost of the project and the source of the matching funds required under subsection (f)(2).(vii) A detailed description of the practices the applicant will implement and maintain to control nonpoint source pollution from the project site.20250HB1794PN2207 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) Other information that the department may require.(c) Waterfront redevelopment plan.--An applicant shall prepare a waterfront redevelopment plan. The waterfront redevelopment plan, at a minimum, must:(1) Clearly designate the geographic area included within the waterfront planning area.(2) Identify the economic impact on the improved area, the surrounding neighborhood and the region in which the waterfront planning area is located.(3) Provide any additional information as required by the department for waterfront redevelopment plans.(d) Publication and notice.--The department shall transmit notice of the program's availability to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(e) Department action.--(1) The department shall review each application for a grant under the program and, within 60 days of receipt of the application, approve or disapprove the application. An application that has not been approved or disapproved by the department within the 60-day period shall be deemed approved.(2) In reviewing an application for a grant under the program, the department shall consider all of the following:(i) Whether the project proposed to be funded is authorized under this act.(ii) Whether the application complies with this act.(iii) Consistency of the project with the waterfront redevelopment plan required under subsection (c) for the area in which the project is located.20250HB1794PN2207 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Additional public access to the waterfront or recreational opportunities for the public provided by the project.(v) Significant contribution by the project to the region's economic and community redevelopment or the revitalization of adjacent communities.(vi) Evidence of adverse economic and socioeconomic conditions within the waterfront planning area.(vii) The viability of the waterfront redevelopment plan required under subsection (c).(viii) The level of public and private commitment and other resources available for the project.(ix) The level of demonstrated commitment from local governments and other local political subdivisions.(x) The level of public and private commitment to improving abandoned real property within the waterfront planning area in which the project is located.(xi) The level of public input and public notification regarding the proposed project.(xii) Documentation of the approval of or access to the matching funds required under subsection (f)(2) and the source of the matching funds.(xiii) Other criteria that the department considers relevant.(f) Award of grants.--(1) The department may issue a grant award to approved applicants for projects that contribute to the revitalization of waterfronts throughout this Commonwealth that meet any of the following purposes:(i) Provide for response activities on waterfront 20250HB1794PN2207 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property consistent with a waterfront redevelopment plan.(ii) Provide for the demolition of buildings and other facilities along a waterfront that are inconsistent with a waterfront redevelopment plan.(iii) Provide for the acquisition of waterfront property or the assembly of waterfront property consistent with a waterfront redevelopment plan.(iv) Provide public infrastructure and public facility improvements to waterfront property consistent with a waterfront redevelopment plan.(2) For each grant under the program, the department shall require that an approved applicant provide matching funds of at least 25% of the project's total cost from other public or private funding sources.(3) Grants may be awarded on a pro rata basis if the total dollar amount of the approved application exceeds the amount of money appropriated by the General Assembly for the program.Section 5. Waterfront Redevelopment Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Waterfront Redevelopment Fund is established in the State Treasury. All appropriations, contributions and alternative funds received by the department as authorized by State law to protect and revitalize coastal waters and waterfronts across this Commonwealth shall be deposited into the fund.(b) Allocation of money.--All money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department and shall be used as follows:(1) At least 85% of the fund shall be used by the department for grants authorized under this act.20250HB1794PN2207 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Not more than 15% of the fund may be used by the department for State and local administration and program services.(c) Alternative funding.--The department may solicit and accept alternative funding, including Federal funds, grants and donations from any source to assist with the goals of this act. All money received by the department under this act to protect and revitalize coastal waters and waterfronts across this Commonwealth shall be deposited into the fund.Section 6. Public outreach.(a) Requirement.--From the money available for administration as authorized under section 5(b)(2), the department shall conduct Statewide outreach to inform the public of the grant program and the grant's purpose to protect and revitalize coastal waters and waterfronts across this Commonwealth.(b) Evaluation.--The department shall evaluate the effectiveness of the money provided under this act in protecting and revitalizing coastal waters and waterfronts across this Commonwealth and make changes as necessary to the outreach described under subsection (a).Section 7. Reports.Not later than one year after the effective date of this section, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the General Assembly on expenditures from the fund and the progress of the public outreach required under section 6.Section 8. Rules and regulations.The department shall adopt or promulgate rules or regulations necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this act.20250HB1794PN2207 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1794PN2207 - 8 - 12